Missouri, session 2026, HB2288.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 260, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 260.217, to read as follows:
260.217. 1. Any first, second, third, or fourth class county may, under section
260.215, adopt an ordinance, rule, regulation, or standard relating to solid waste
management in such county. Any such ordinance, rule, regulation, or standard may
address the storage, collection, transportation, processing, or disposal of solid wastes;
may address the siting of any solid waste disposal area, as defined in section 260.200;
and may impose reasonable setback distances that are applicable to any solid waste
disposal area located in such county. Any setbacks contained in an ordinance, rule,
regulation, or standard adopted under this section shall not constitute planning and
zoning, as such terms are defined in chapter 64.
2. Any setback applicable to any solid waste disposal area contained in any
ordinance, rule, regulation, or standard adopted under subsection 1 of this section shall
not be more stringent than the following:
(1) Three miles from:
(a) The defined incorporated limits of a city, town, or village located within the
county;
(b) An accredited school or property owned and operated by any of the school
districts or educational institutions within the county;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2288 2
(c) A church or place of worship within the county;
(d) A platted subdivision within the county; or
(e) Public areas designated for recreational activity, including parks and ball
fields, within the county;
(2) Three-quarters of one mile from any occupied dwelling used for residential
purposes for at least six months during a calendar year; and
(3) Two hundred feet from the property line of the solid waste disposal area.
✔